Utah statutes.
13-2-4.   Annual report -- Budget.

(1) On or before the 1st day of October each year, the director in connection with the executive director shall report to the governor and the Legislature for the preceding fiscal year on the operations, activities, and goals of the division.

(2)  The director shall prepare and submit to the executive director a budget of the administrative expenses for the division.

